Oklahoma, session 2026, SB264.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 143 of Title 63, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The Corporation Commission shall coordinate with the Office


of Management and Enterprise Services and Oklahoma One-Call System,


Inc. to establish a GIS-based web service application to support


public works projects, utility planning, and infrastructure


coordination. The application shall be a voluntary, free-of-charge


platform to promote efficiencies and identify opportunities for


entities to coordinate efforts on public works activities. Entities


conducting public works projects may utilize the application to

Req. No. 1025 Page 1


share project information, the geographic scope of a given project,


and other high-level project details for the purpose of coordinating


public works projects with similar timelines.


B. The Commission shall solicit public comment from potential


public works participants in the program, including internet service


providers, public utilities, municipal utilities, oil and gas


operators, political subdivisions, and any other industrial,


commercial, or public entities which may have an interest in


potential projects.


C. The Commission shall contract with an outside entity


pursuant to the Public Competitive Bidding Act of 1974. The


Commission shall promulgate rules to effectuate the provisions of


this section.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1025 RD 12/30/2024 7:22:29 PM

















Req. No. 1025 Page 2